apertium-nno.nno.dix
<pardef n="ær/e_no-cp__vblex_adj" c="-ar/-a/-a (LR -d/-t), otherwise like svar/e__vblex_adj">
  <e r="LR"><p><l>d</l>     <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>t</l>     <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>     <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>d</l>     <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>t</l>     <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>     <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>de</l>    <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>     <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>te</l>    <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>de</l>    <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>     <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>de</l>    <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>te</l>    <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ande</l>  <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>

  <!-- wsd todo ære_vørdnad vs ære_mognast -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>      <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>e</l>     <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>a</l>     <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l><r>e</r></p><par n="a_vs_e__vblex_inf_no-cp"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ast</l>   <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>t</l>     <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>     <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>d</l>     <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ar</l>    <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>er</l>    <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>te</l>    <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>     <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>de</l>    <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="st/å__vblex_adj">
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ådd</l>   <r>å<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ått</l>   <r>å<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ådd</l>   <r>å<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ått</l>   <r>å<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ått</l>   <r>å<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ått</l>   <r>å<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ådde</l>  <r>å<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>åtte</l>  <r>å<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ådde</l>  <r>å<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ått</l>   <r>å<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ådde</l>  <r>å<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>åtte</l>  <r>å<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ådde</l>  <r>å<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>åtte</l>  <r>å<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>åande</l> <r>å<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>å</l>     <r>å<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>å</l>     <r>å<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="cp-both"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>åast</l>  <r>å<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ått</l>   <r>å<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>år</l>    <r>å<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>o</l>     <r>å<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>od</l>    <r>å<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="st/å_no-cp__vblex_adj">
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ådd</l>   <r>å<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ått</l>   <r>å<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ådd</l>   <r>å<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ått</l>   <r>å<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ått</l>   <r>å<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ått</l>   <r>å<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ådde</l>  <r>å<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>åtte</l>  <r>å<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ådde</l>  <r>å<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ått</l>   <r>å<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>åtte</l>  <r>å<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ådde</l>  <r>å<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>åtte</l>  <r>å<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ådde</l>  <r>å<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ått</l>  <r>å<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>åtte</l>  <r>å<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>åande</l> <r>å<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>å</l>     <r>å<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>å</l>     <r>å<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-L"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>åast</l>  <r>å<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ått</l>   <r>å<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>år</l>    <r>å<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>o</l>     <r>å<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>od</l>    <r>å<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="ire">         <i>ir</i><par n="ær/e_no-cp__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="motstå">      <i>motst</i><par n="st/å__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="bestå">           <i>best</i><par n="st/å__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="stå">             <i>st</i><par n="st/å_no-cp__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="bistå">             <i>bist</i><par n="st/å__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="framstå">             <i>framst</i><par n="st/å__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="forstå">          <i>forst</i><par n="st/å__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="ære">             <i>ær</i><par n="ær/e_no-cp__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="oppstå">          <i>oppst</i><par n="st/å__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="avstå"><i>avst</i><par n="st/å__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="misforstå"><i>misforst</i><par n="st/å__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="påstå"><i>påst</i><par n="st/å__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="tilstå"><i>tilst</i><par n="st/å__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="underforstå"><i>underforst</i><par n="st/å__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="utstå"><i>utst</i><par n="st/å__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="vedstå"><i>vedst</i><par n="st/å__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="more seg">            <i>mor</i><par n="ær/e_no-cp__vblex_adj"/><ig><b/>seg</ig></e>
<e r="RL" lm="pare seg"> <i>par</i><par n="ær/e_no-cp__vblex_adj"/><ig><b/>seg</ig></e>
<e lm="stå på"><i>st</i><par n="st/å_no-cp__vblex_adj"/><ig><b/>på</ig></e>
<e lm="stå att"><i>st</i><par n="st/å_no-cp__vblex_adj"/><ig><b/>att</ig></e>
<e lm="stå for"><i>st</i><par n="st/å_no-cp__vblex_adj"/><ig><b/>for</ig></e>
<e lm="stå fram"><i>st</i><par n="st/å_no-cp__vblex_adj"/><ig><b/>fram</ig></e>
<e lm="stå fram med"><i>st</i><par n="st/å_no-cp__vblex_adj"/><ig><b/>fram<b/>med</ig></e>
<e lm="stå fram som"><i>st</i><par n="st/å_no-cp__vblex_adj"/><ig><b/>fram<b/>som</ig></e>
<e lm="stå framfor"><i>st</i><par n="st/å_no-cp__vblex_adj"/><ig><b/>framfor</ig></e>
<e lm="stå framme"><i>st</i><par n="st/å_no-cp__vblex_adj"/><ig><b/>framme</ig></e>
<e lm="stå isolert"><i>st</i><par n="st/å_no-cp__vblex_adj"/><ig><b/>isolert</ig></e>
<e lm="stå inne"><i>st</i><par n="st/å_no-cp__vblex_adj"/><ig><b/>inne</ig></e>
<e lm="stå opp"><i>st</i><par n="st/å_no-cp__vblex_adj"/><ig><b/>opp</ig></e>
<e lm="stå opp igjen"><i>st</i><par n="st/å_no-cp__vblex_adj"/><ig><b/>opp<b/>igjen</ig></e>
<e lm="stå opp for"><i>st</i><par n="st/å_no-cp__vblex_adj"/><ig><b/>opp<b/>for</ig></e>
<e lm="stå seg"><i>st</i><par n="st/å_no-cp__vblex_adj"/><ig><b/>seg</ig></e>
<e lm="stå løpet ut"><i>st</i><par n="st/å_no-cp__vblex_adj"/><ig><b/>løpet<b/>ut</ig></e>
<e lm="stå imot"><i>st</i><par n="st/å_no-cp__vblex_adj"/><ig><b/>imot</ig></e>
<e lm="stå ikkje i motstrid til">   <i>st</i><par n="st/å_no-cp__vblex_adj"/><ig><b/>ikkje<b/>i<b/>motstrid<b/>til</ig></e>
<e lm="stå i motstrid til det å">   <i>st</i><par n="st/å_no-cp__vblex_adj"/><ig><b/>i<b/>motstrid<b/>til<b/>det<b/>å</ig></e>
<e lm="gjenstå">	<i>gjenst</i><par n="st/å__vblex_adj"/></e>
